pl: Typ złącza/adaptera EV: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Type 2; Vehicle-to-grid (V2G); Vehicle-to-home (V2H); Inne
da: EV-stik/adaptertype: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Type 2; Vehicle-to-grid (V2G); Vehicle-to-home (V2H); Andet
hu: Elektromos jármű csatlakozójának/adapterének típusa: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Type 2; V2G (Vehicle-to-grid); V2H (Vehicle-to-home); Egyéb
es: Tipo de conector/adaptador EV: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Tipo 2; Vehículo a red (V2G); Vehículo a casa (V2H); Otros
ko: EV 커넥터/어댑터 유형: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Type 2; V2G(Vehicle-to-grid); V2H(Vehicle-to-home); 기타
zh-TW: 電動汽車連接器/轉接器類型: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; 特斯拉; 2 型; 汽車對電網 (V2G); 車輛對家庭的供電 (V2H); 其他
ro-RO: Tip conector/adaptor EV: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Tip 2; Vehicul la rețea (V2G); Vehicul la casă (V2H); Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de conector/adaptador EV: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Tipo 2; Uso bidirecional de energia (V2G); Carregamento bidirecional (V2H); Outro
tr: Elektrikli araç konnektör/adaptör tipi: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Tip 2; Araçtan şebekeye (V2G); Araçtan eve (V2H); Diğer
de: Typ des Elektrofahrzeug-Anschlusses/-Adapters: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Typ-2; Vehicle-to-Grid (V2G); Vehicle-to-Home (V2H); Sonstiges
sv: EV-kontakt/adaptertyp: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Typ 2; Fordon till elnätet (V2G); Fordon till hem (V2H); Övrigt
lt-LT: Elektrinės transporto priemonės jungties / adapterio tipas: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; „Tesla“; 2 tipas; Automobilis – elektros tinklas (V2G); Automobilis – namai (V2H); Kita
ja: EVコネクタ/アダプターの種類: CCS (コンボ); CHAdeMO (チャデモ); J1772; テスラ; Type2; V2G (クルマから送電網へ); V2H (クルマから家へ); その他
el: Τύπος συνδετήρα/προσαρμογέα EV: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Τύπου 2; Όχημα προς δίκτυο (V2G); Όχημα προς σπίτι (V2H); Άλλο
en: EV connector/adapter type: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Type 2; Vehicle-to-grid (V2G); Vehicle-to-home (V2H); Other
cs: Typ konektoru/adaptéru EV: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Typ 2; Z vozidla do sítě (V2G); Z vozidla do domu (V2H); Jiné
sk-SK: Typ konektora/adaptéra elektromobilov: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Typ 2; Z vozidla do siete (V2G); Z vozidla do domu (V2H); Iné
fr: Type de connecteur/adaptateur de VE: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Type 2; Véhicule-réseau (V2G); Véhicule à domicile (V2H); Autre
it: Tipo di adattatore/connettore EV: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Tipo 2; Vehicle-to-grid (V2G); Vehicle-to-home (V2H); Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de conector/adaptador EV: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Tipo 2; Vehicle-to-grid (V2G); Vehicle-to-home (V2H); Outro
ru: Тип вилки или переходника для электротранспорта: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Тип 2; Автомобиль-сеть (V2G); Автомобиль-дом (V2H); Другой
bg-BG: Тип конектор/адаптер за ЕПС: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Тип 2; Превозно средство към мрежата (V2G); Превозно средство до дома (V2H); Други
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อ/อะแดปเตอร์ EV: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; ประเภท 2; นำไฟฟ้าจากรถยนต์ไฟฟ้าส่งไปสู่ระบบไฟสาธารณะ (V2G); นำไฟฟ้าจากรถยนต์ไฟฟ้าส่งไปในบ้าน (V2H); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta konektorja/adapterja za električno vozilo: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Vrsta 2; Od vozila do omrežja (V2G); Od vozila do doma (V2H); Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta EV priključka/adaptera: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Tip 2; Vehicle-to-grid (V2G); Vehicle-to-home (V2H); Ostalo
fi: EV-liitin-/sovitintyyppi: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Tyyppi 2; Ajoneuvosta verkkoon (V2G); Ajoneuvosta kotiin (V2H); Muu
zh-CN: EV 连接器/适配器类型: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; 2 型; 车并网 (V2G); 车到家 (V2H); 其他
nb: Elbilkontakt/adaptertype: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Type 2; Kjøretøy-til-nett (V2G); Kjøretøy-til-hjem (V2H); Annet
nl: Type EV-connector/adapter: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Type 2; Vehicle-to-grid (V2G); Vehicle-to-home (V2H); Andere
vi: Loại đầu nối/bộ chuyển đổi sạc xe điện: CCS; CHAdeMO; J1772; Tesla; Loại 2; Xe nối lưới (V2G); Năng lượng từ xe đến nhà (V2H); Khác